Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-344] Conditions precedent to
negotiating and entering into a project agreement. (a) Prior to entering
into negotiations with respect to a project agreement or at any time during the
negotiations, the department shall require that as a condition to the
negotiations or the continuation thereof, the State shall be reimbursed for any
and all costs and expenses incurred by it even though a project agreement may
not be entered into. The department may further require the deposit of moneys
with the department as security for the reimbursement. Any amount of the
deposit in excess of the amount required to reimburse the State shall be
returned by the department to the party that has made the deposit. The State
shall not be required to pay to the project party any interest or earnings on the
deposit.

(b) The department shall not enter into any
project agreement with respect to any project unless the legislature shall have
first authorized the issuance of special purpose revenue bonds to finance the
project pursuant to section 39A-347 and the department has thereafter found and
determined either that:

(1) The project party is a responsible party, whether
by reason of economic assets or experience in the type of enterprise to be
undertaken through the project, or otherwise; or

(2) The obligations of the project party under the
project agreement will be unconditionally guaranteed by a person who is a
responsible party, whether by reason of economic assets or experience in the
type of enterprise to be undertaken through the project, or otherwise. [L 2012,
c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next